apertium-kir.kir@Cyrl-kir@Latn.twol
Alphabet 

 !ء
 !ئ ا ە ب پ ت ج چ خ د ر ز ژ س ش غ ف ق ك گ ڭ ل م ن ھ و ۇ ۆ ۋ ې ى ي  ٸ ٶ ٷ ٵ 
 
 !% ء

 ! ء ا ە ه ې ب ت پ ج چ خ ح د ر ز ژ س ش ع ف ق ك گ ڭ ل م ن ھ و ۇ ۋ ى ي ۆ

 А:A
 Б:B
 В:V
 Г:G Г:Ğ
 Д:D
 Е:E
 Ж:J Ж:Ž
 З:z
 И:İ
 Й:Y
 К:K К:Q
 Л:L
 М:M
 Н:N
 Ң:Ŋ
 О:O
 Ө:Ö
 П:P
 Р:R
 С:S
 Т:T
 У:U
 Ү:Ü
 Ф:F
 Х:X  ! خ
 Ч:Ç
 Ш:Ş
 Щ:Ś
 Ь:ʼ
 Ы:I
 Ъ:0
 Э:E

 а:a
 б:b
 в:v
 г:g г:ğ
 д:d
 е:e
 ж:j ж:ž
 з:z
 и:i
 й:y
 к:k к:q
 л:l
 м:m
 н:n
 ң:ŋ
 о:o
 ө:ö
 п:p
 р:r
 с:s
 т:t
 у:u
 ү:ü
 ф:f
 х:x  ! خ
 ч:ç
 ш:ş
 щ:ś
 ь:ʼ
 ы:ı
 ъ:0
 э:e


 %{й%}:0
 %{й%}:y

 %{ˈ%}:0
 %{ˈ%}:ˈ
 
 ;


Sets 

Vow = и ү е э ө а о у ы 
      И Ү Е Э Ө А О У Ы ;

!letter = ء ئ ا ە ب پ ت ج چ خ د ر ز ژ س ش غ ف ق ك گ ڭ ل م ن ھ و ۇ ۅ ۉ ۋ ى ي ;

backVow = а о ы у
          А О Ы У ;

frontVow = и ү е э ө
           И Ү Е Э Ө ;

Cons = б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ 
       Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ ;

frontConsCyr = к г
               К Г ;

Nasal = Н М Ң
        н м ң ;

frontSound = k g e i ö ü
             K G E İ Ö Ü ;

backSound = q ğ a ı o u
            Q Ğ A I O U ;

Rules 

"%{й%}:y after vowels except е and after ъ"
%{й%}:y <=> [ Vow: - [ э: | е: ]/:0* ] _ ;
            ъ: _ ;

"к in the context of back vowels"
Cx:Cy <=> :backSound _ [ .#. | \[ %{й%}: :frontSound ] | \:frontSound ] ;
          [ .#. | \:frontSound ] _ :backSound ;
      except
          .#. а: _ (%{й%}:) е: ;  ! аке:ake (*aqe)
          .#. б: (%{й%}:) е: _ а: ;  ! Бегайым:Begayım (*Beğayım)
          .#. _ Cons: ;    ! климат
          _ Cons: .#. ;    ! объект
          _ Cons: Cons: ;  ! объектке
          .#. б: л: о: _ ; ! блокада
          ! keep in mind if modifying this rule:
          ! - байке:bɑjke
          ! - багелек:bɑʁelek
      where Cx in ( к К )
            Cy in ( q Q )
      matched ;

"г in the context of back vowels"
Cx:Cy <=> :backSound _ ;
          [ .#. | \:frontSound ] _ :backSound ;
      except
          _ .#. ;
          _ (%{й%}:) :frontSound ;
          .#. а: _ (%{й%}:) е: ;  ! аке:ake (*aqe)
          .#. б: (%{й%}:) е: _ а: ;  ! Бегайым:Begayım (*Beğayım)
          .#. _ Cons: ;    ! климат
          _ Cons: .#. ;    ! объект
          _ Cons: Cons: ;  ! объектке
          .#. б: л: о: _ ; ! блокада
          .#. б: а: _ е: ; ! багелек
          ! keep in mind if modifying this rule:
          ! - байке:bɑjke
          ! - багелек:bɑʁelek
      where Cx in ( г Г )
            Cy in ( ğ Ğ )
      matched ;


"к in onset clusters (loanwords) and front-vowel contexts"
Cx:Cy <=> .#. _ Cons: ;    ! климат
          _ (%{й%}:) :frontSound ;
          :frontSound _ ;
          _ Cons: .#. ;    ! объект
          _ Cons: Cons: ;  ! объектке
          :frontSound Cons:+ _ ; !
          .#. б: л: о: _ ; ! блокада
      where Cx in ( к К )
            Cy in ( k K )
      matched ;

"г in onset clusters (loanwords), word-finally, and front-vowel contexts"
Cx:Cy <=> .#. _ Cons: ;    ! 
          _ (%{й%}:) :frontSound ;
          :frontSound _ ;
          _ Cons: .#. ;    ! 
          _ Cons: Cons: ;  ! 
          :frontSound Cons:+ _ ; ! Вашингтон
          .#. б: л: о: _ ; ! блог?
			 _ .#. ;  ! геолог etc.
      except
          .#. б: а: _ е: ; ! багелек
      where Cx in ( г Г )
            Cy in ( g G )
      matched ;



"ж as ʒ only after д"
ж:ž <=> [ д: | Д: ]  _ ;

"ъ:y before е"   ! объект:obyekt  (ю, я, ё should already get y)
ъ:y <=> _ [ е: | Е: ] ;


! remaining issues:
!  - [✔] объекттерге:*obyektterğe/*объекттерге
!  - [✔] *аймакка:*aymakka/aymaqqa
!  - [✔] блокада: *bloqada/blokada
!  - [✔] ^экологиялык/*экологиялык
!  - [✔] геолог: *geoloğ/geolog (etc.)
!  - [ ] багелек: *bagelek/bağelek
!  - [ ] Еврошаркет Evroşarket
!  - [ ] А7нин
!  - [ ] Украинага Uqrainağa
!  - [ ] qompaniyalar
